California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
No member of the commission or member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission shall receive a salary. Each member of the commission, except ex officio government members, and each member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission, may receive an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day, as established by the commission. This amount shall be paid for each day spent in actual attendance at, or in traveling to and from, meetings of the commission or committees of the commission, or on special assignment for the commission, as approved by the commission. Members shall also receive necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances, as approved by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74575.

All funds received from the assessments levied pursuant to this chapter or otherwise received by the commission shall be deposited in banks which the commission may designate and shall be disbursed by order of the commission through an agent or agents as it may designate. The agent or agents shall be bonded by a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state, in favor of the commission, in an amount of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74576.

(a) The state is not liable for the acts of the commission or its contracts. Payments of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the commission are limited to the assets of the commission.

(b) No member, alternate member, or any employee or agent of the commission, is personally liable for the contracts of the commission or for errors in judgment, mistakes or other acts, either of commission or omission, except for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. Liability is several and not joint, and no member, alternate member, or any employee or agent of the commission is liable individually for the default, act, or omission of any other member, alternate member, or any employee or agent of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of the Commission [74591. - 74608.]

74591.

The powers and duties of the commission shall include, but are not limited to, all of those contained in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74592.

The commission may adopt and from time to time alter, rescind, modify, and amend all proper and necessary bylaws, rules, regulations, operating procedures, and orders for carrying out this chapter, including appeals from any bylaws, rules, regulations, operating procedures, or orders of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74593.

The commission may administer and enforce this chapter and do and perform all actions and exercise all powers incidental to, in connection with, or deemed reasonably necessary for, proper or advisable effectuation of this chapter, including, but not limited to, entering into contracts for services with public and private agencies which are deemed necessary by the commission to carry out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74594.

The commission may appoint its own officers, including a chairperson, one or more vice chairpersons, and other officers it deems necessary. The officers shall have the powers and duties delegated to them by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74595.

The commission may employ a person to serve at the pleasure of the commission as president, and other personnel, including legal counsel, necessary to carry out this chapter. If the person engages in any conduct which the director determines is not in the public interest or which is in violation of this chapter, the director shall notify the commission of the conduct and request that corrective action and, if appropriate, disciplinary action be taken by the commission. If the commission fails or refuses to correct the situation or to take disciplinary action satisfactory to the director, the director may suspend or discharge the person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74596.

The commission may fix the compensation for all employees of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74597.

The commission may appoint committees composed of both members and nonmembers of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74598.

The commission may establish offices, incur expenses, enter into any and all contracts and agreements, create liabilities, and borrow funds in advance of receipt of assessments as may be necessary in the opinion of the commission for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter and the performance of its duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74599.

The commission shall keep accurate books, records, and accounts of all of its dealings, which shall be subject to an annual audit by an auditing firm selected by the commission with the concurrence of the director. A summary of the audit shall be made a part of an annual report to all vintners, copies of which shall also be submitted to the Legislature and the department. In addition, the director may, as he or she determines necessary, conduct or cause to be conducted a fiscal and compliance audit of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74600.

The commission may engage in market development and market research through plans and programs to enhance the sale of California wine and wine-related products for the purpose of maintaining existing markets and creating new and larger domestic and foreign markets, and to educate and instruct the public with respect to the uses and value of California wine and wine-related products. However, any plans and programs so developed and conducted shall not be directed towards a particular private brand or trade name, although private brands and trade names may be used in wine tastings and other similar programs authorized by the commission. In addition, the plans and programs shall make no use of false or unwarranted claims on behalf of California wine or wine-related products, nor disparage the quality, value, sale, or use of any commodity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74601.

The commission may accept contributions of private, state, or federal funds that may be available for these purposes, and may allocate funds by contract or agreement to other persons or to state or federal agencies conducting this research.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74602.

The commission may undertake appropriate research relating to the production and processing of wine and winegrapes, including the development of new wine-related products and uses for these products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74603.

The commission may publish and distribute bulletins or other communications relating to the California wine and wine-related products industries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74604.

The commission may establish an assessment rate to defray operating costs of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74605.

The commission may establish an annual budget according to accepted accounting practices. The budget shall be concurred in by the director prior to disbursement of funds, except for disbursements made pursuant to Section 74596.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74606.

The commission shall submit to the director, for his or her concurrence, an annual statement of contemplated activities authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74607.

The commission may investigate and prosecute civil violations of this chapter and file complaints with appropriate law enforcement agencies or officers for suspected criminal violations of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74608.

The director may require that any contract in which the commission is a party be submitted to him or her for concurrence prior to the commission entering into the contract. If the director requires the submission of a contract and does not concur in that contract, he or she shall hold a public hearing within 14 days of the initial decision not to concur. In the notice of the hearing, the director shall present a written explanation of his or her decision. The director shall make a final decision on whether or not to concur in the contract within 30 days of the hearing. The contract may not be executed from the time that the director makes the intial decision not to concur to the time of the final decision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Implementation and Voting Procedures [74621. - 74629.]

74621.

This chapter, except as necessary to conduct an implementation referendum, shall not become operative until the director finds, in a referendum conducted by him or her, or a person designated by the director, that a favorable vote has been given pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74622.

(a) Not later than April 1, 1987, the director shall establish a list of vintners who are eligible to vote on the implementation of this chapter. Eligibility shall be based on volume processed in the immediately preceding marketing season. In establishing the list, the director may require producers, vintners, county agricultural commissioners, and others to submit the names and mailing addresses of all vintners. The director also may require that the information provided include the quantity of winegrapes sold to vintners and the quantity of winegrapes processed by vintners or, in the alternative, may establish procedures for receiving the information at the time of the referendum. The request for this information shall be in writing. The information required by the director shall be filed within 30 days following receipt of the written notice. 

(b) Any vintner whose name does not appear on the director’s list may have his or her name included on the list by filing with the director a signed statement identifying himself or herself as a vintner. Failure to be on the list does not exempt the vintner from paying assessments under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74622.5.

For the purpose of voting in the referendum required in Section 74621, only a person who would be required to pay the assessment pursuant to Section 74652.5 shall be considered a vintner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 8, Sec. 2.   Effective March 27, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

74623.

In determining whether this chapter shall become operative, the director shall find that at least 40 percent of the total number of vintners from the list established by the director participated in the referendum, and that either one of the following has occurred:

(a) Sixty-five percent or more of the vintners who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the vintners so voting processed a majority of the volume of winegrapes in the preceding marketing season by all the vintners who voted in the referendum.

(b) A majority of the vintners who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the vintners so voting processed 65 percent or more of the volume of winegrapes in the preceding marketing season by all the vintners who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 8, Sec. 3.   Effective March 27, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

74624.

The director shall establish a period in which to conduct the referendum which shall not be less than 10 days nor more than 60 days in duration, and may prescribe additional procedures to conduct the referendum. If the initial period established is less than 60 days, the director may extend the period. However, the total referendum period may not exceed 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74625.

Nonreceipt of a ballot shall not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74626.

If the director finds that a favorable vote has not been given as provided in this chapter, he or she shall certify and declare this chapter inoperative. If the director finds that a favorable vote has been given as provided in this chapter, he or she shall certify and give notice of the favorable vote to all vintners whose names and addresses may be on file with the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74627.

Upon certification of the commission, the vintner members and their alternate members who are then serving on the California Wine and Winegrape Improvement Program made effective by the director on August 21, 1984, shall become the initial members and alternate members of the commission and shall serve in accordance with the requirements of Section 74569.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74628.

Subsequent to the first election of commissioners under this chapter, persons to be elected to the commission shall be selected pursuant to the nomination and election procedures established by the commission with the concurrence of the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74629.

(a) Prior to the implementation referendum conducted by the director, the proponents of the commission shall deposit with the director the amount that the director deems necessary to defray the expenses in creating the commission, including, but not limited to, preparing the necessary vintner list and conducting the referendum.

(b) Any funds remaining after paying expenses shall be returned to the proponents of the commission who deposited the funds with the director.

(c) The commission may reimburse the proponents of the commission for any funds deposited with the director which were used in carrying out this article and for any legal expenses and costs incurred in establishing the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Assessments and Records [74651. - 74661.]

74651.

(a) Prior to the beginning of each marketing season or as soon thereafter as possible, the commission shall establish an assessment rate for the marketing season.

(b) Unless approved by a two-thirds vote of the commission, the assessment rate shall not exceed 1 percent of the gross dollar value of winegrapes processed by vintners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 8, Sec. 4.   Effective March 27, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

74651.5.

Prior to the beginning of each marketing season, the commission may establish a voluntary minimum assessment rate applicable to vintners who process winegrapes in the marketing season in a quantity of 100 tons or less and who are exempt from paying the assessment established pursuant to Section 74651. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, any vintner who voluntarily pays the minimum assessment shall be granted the same rights and privileges as vintners processing over 100 tons in that marketing season.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 854, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

74652.

Any vintner who is also a producer who processes winegrapes shall pay the assessment on the winegrapes. The “weighted average producer returns per ton” by district as published in the most recent Final Grape Crush Report issued annually for the current marketing season by the department shall be used as the basis for determining product gross dollar value and the assessment on the winegrapes where no sale is involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 8, Sec. 5.   Effective March 27, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

74652.5.

Unless otherwise exempted by this chapter, the assessment provided for in this article shall be levied on vintners and vintners who are also producers who engage in the act of processing winegrapes into must for the purpose of making grape juice, grape concentrate, wine, or products thereof, including high proof or brandy or processing field crushed must for the purpose of making grape juice, grape concentrate, wine, or products thereof, including high proof or brandy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 8, Sec. 6.   Effective March 27, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

74653.

This chapter does not apply to winegrapes processed only for a vintner’s home use. However, any vintner claiming this exemption shall file an affidavit with the commission establishing the manner in which the winegrapes are used. The commission shall then determine whether the exemption applies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74654.

Every vintner shall keep a complete and accurate record of all winegrapes processed. The records shall be in simple form and contain information as the commission shall prescribe. The records shall be preserved by the vintner for a period of two years and shall be offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon written demand of the commission or its duly authorized agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74655.

All proprietary information obtained by the commission or the director from producers or vintners, and all lists of vintners in the possession of the commission or the director are confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required in a judicial proceeding. Information on volume shipments, commodity value, and other related information which is required for reports to governmental agencies; financial reports made to the commission or aggregate sales and inventory information; and any other information which is requested from the commission, may be disclosed by the commission. In no event may individual producer or vintner information be disclosed by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74656.

Any assessment levied by the commission, pursuant to this chapter, is a personal debt of every person so assessed and is due and payable in a time and manner prescribed by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74657.

Any person who fails to file a return, or remit or pay any assessment within the time required by the commission shall pay to the commission a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment determined to be due and, in addition, 112 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74658.

(a) Any vintner who processes winegrapes into must, grape juice, or grape concentrate for the manufacture of nonalcoholic beverages other than nonalcoholic wine may apply to the commission for either an exemption from the assessment due pursuant to this chapter or for a refund of the assessment on that portion of his or her production used in the manufacture of nonalcoholic beverages other than nonalcoholic wine.

(b) In order to be eligible for the exemption or refund, the vintner shall file an affidavit with the commission attesting that the must, grape juice, or grape concentrate was, in fact, used for the manufacture of nonalcoholic beverages other than nonalcoholic wine. The commission shall render a determination on the claim. All approved claims shall be subject to verification through an independent audit of the claimant’s business records by the commission or its duly authorized agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 147, Sec. 1.   Effective July 9, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

74659.

Any vintner receiving an exemption or refund pursuant to Section 74658, shall, in addition to the requirements of Section 74654, maintain sales invoices and any other business documents specified by the commission as necessary to verify the claim. The records shall be preserved by the vintner for a period of two years and shall be offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon written demand of the commission or its duly authorized agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 147, Sec. 2.   Effective July 9, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

74660.

No refund pursuant to Section 74658 shall be approved by the commission after two years from the date the assessment was due. Failure to file a claim within the time prescribed in this section constitutes a waiver of all demands for a refund against the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 147, Sec. 3.   Effective July 9, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

74661.

Within 30 days, after disallowing any claim in whole or in part, the commission shall serve written notice of its action on the claimant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 147, Sec. 4.   Effective July 9, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Actions and Penalties [74671. - 74674.]

74671.

It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Willfully render or furnish a false report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(b) When engaged in the marketing, processing, or other related activity of wine or wine-related products, to fail or refuse to furnish the commission or its duly authorized agents information concerning the name and address of the persons from whom winegrapes have been received.

(c) Secrete, destroy, or alter records required to be maintained under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74672.

The commission shall establish procedures for the purpose of according individuals aggrieved by its acts or determinations an informal hearing. Appeals from decisions of the commission may be made to the director. The determination of the director shall be subject to judicial review upon petition filed with the appropriate superior court. Pending disposition of any appeal and judicial review, the parties shall abide by the acts or determinations of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74673.

(a) The commission may commence civil action and utilize all remedies provided in law or equity for the collection of assessments and civil penalties and the obtaining of injunctive relief or specific performance regarding this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Upon entry of any final judgment on behalf of the commission against any defendant, the court shall enjoin the defendant from conducting any type of business regarding the commodity subject to this chapter until there is full compliance and satisfaction of the judgment. Upon a favorable verdict for the commission, it shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for any reasonable attorney’s fees and other actual related costs. Venue may be established at the domicile or place of business of the defendant or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74674.

Suspension or termination of this chapter in accordance with Article 8 (commencing with Section 74691) shall not result in any of the following:

(a) Affecting, waiving, or termination of any right, duty, obligation, or liability which may have arisen or may thereafter arise in connection with this chapter.

(b) Releasing, condoning, or dismissal of any violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Continuation or Suspension and Termination [74691. - 74696.]

74691.

(a) On or before June 30, 1990, the commission shall cause a referendum to be conducted among vintners in the manner specified in Section 74622 to determine whether this chapter shall be reapproved and continued in effect. In determining whether this chapter is reapproved, the director shall find that at least 40 percent of the total number of vintners from the list established by the director participated in the referendum, and that either one of the following has occurred:

(1) Sixty-five percent or more of the vintners who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the vintners so voting processed a majority of the volume of winegrapes in the preceding marketing season by all the vintners who voted in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the vintners who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the vintners so voting processed 65 percent or more of the volume of the winegrapes in the preceding marketing season by all the vintners who voted in the referendum.

(b) If the director finds that a favorable vote has been given to continue the commission, he or she shall so certify and this chapter or the appropriate portions thereof shall remain in effect. If the director finds that a favorable vote has not been given, he or she shall so certify and declare the operations of this chapter suspended upon expiration of the marketing season. No bond or security shall be required for any such referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 854, Sec. 1.2.)
-------------------------------------------

74692.

Following a favorable referendum conducted prior to June 30, 1990, a referendum shall be conducted by the commission every fifth year thereafter unless a referendum is conducted as a result of a petition pursuant to this article. In that case, the referendum shall be every fifth year following the industry petitioned referendum following procedures provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74693.

(a) Upon a finding by a two-thirds vote of the commission that this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes, the commission may recommend to the director that this chapter be suspended.

(b) Alternatively, the director may be petitioned to suspend this chapter. The petition shall be signed by 20 percent of the vintners by number who processed not less than 20 percent of the volume of winegrapes in the immediately preceding marketing season. The director shall hold a hearing on the petition after receiving it.

(c) The director shall, upon receipt of the recommendation to suspend this chapter from the commission, or may, after holding the hearing on the petition to suspend this chapter, hold a referendum among the vintners to determine if the commission shall be suspended. However, the director shall not hold a referendum as a result of the petition unless the petitioner shows by the weight of evidence that this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes.

(d) The director shall establish a referendum period, which shall not be less than 10 days nor more than 60 days in duration. The director may prescribe additional procedures as may be necessary to conduct the referendum. At the close of the referendum period, the director shall tabulate the ballots filed during the period. If at least 40 percent of the total number of vintners from the list established by the director participate in the referendum, the director shall suspend this chapter if he or she finds either of the following has occurred:

(1) Sixty-five percent or more of the vintners who voted in the referendum, voted in favor of suspension; and the vintners so voting processed a majority of the total quantity of winegrapes processed in the preceding marketing season by all of the vintners who participated in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the vintners who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension; and the vintners so voting processed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of winegrapes processed in the preceding marketing season by all of the vintners who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 8, Sec. 7.   Effective March 27, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

74694.

(a) The director shall terminate the commission at the end of the current marketing season if the director finds that termination is requested in writing, within a 90-day period, by at least 51 percent of the eligible vintners that are directly affected that process at least 51 percent of the volume of the product.

(b) The person or persons originating the request shall file a written notice with the director in a manner that establishes the date the request is initiated. Any person may withdraw his or her name from the petition requesting the termination prior to the time the request is presented to the director.

(c) The signatures to the petition requesting termination need not all be appended to one sheet of paper. Each person signing the petition shall add his or her signature and business address. If no business address is given, a designation of the place of business shall be given which will enable the location to be readily ascertained.

(d) The petition shall bear a copy of the notice of intention. Signatures shall be secured within the time limit specified in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 8, Sec. 8.   Effective March 27, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

74695.

After the effective date of suspension of this chapter, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and any and all funds remaining held by the commission and not required to defray the expenses of concluding and terminating the commission shall be returned on a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding marketing season. However, if the commission finds that the amounts so returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of the pro rata refund to these persons, any funds shall be paid into an appropriate program conducted by the University of California or the California State University, another state agency, or a federal agency which deals with the purposes of this chapter. If no program exists, the funds shall be paid into the State Treasury as unclaimed trust funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74696.

Upon suspension of this chapter, the commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to all vintners affected by the suspension whose names and addresses are on file.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.6. California Grape Rootstock Improvement Commission [74701. - 74796.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration and General Provisions [74701. - 74707.]

74701.

The production of grape rootstock constitutes an important industry of this state that not only provides substantial and necessary revenues for the state and employment for its citizens, but also furnishes essential food vital to the public health and welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 595, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74702.

The maintenance of the grape rootstock industry of California is necessary to assure the consuming public of a continuous supply of good fruit for the table, raisins, and wine grapes, and establishes consistent and needed levels of income for those engaged in the industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 595, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74702.5.

The successes that the grape rootstock industry has enjoyed have come in part through a commitment to industry funded research, which has led to significant improvements in the quality and variety of the grapes and grape products available to consumers. The establishment of the commission is intended to enhance this research effort and move the grape rootstock industry toward its potential, resulting in increased consumer value and enhanced grower returns.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 49.3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74703.

The production and marketing of grape rootstock produced in this state is hereby declared to be affected with a public interest. This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 595, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74704.

No action taken by the commission, or by any individual commission board member in accordance with this chapter or with regulations adopted under this chapter, is a violation of the so-called Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of that Part 2), or any statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 595, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74705.

This chapter shall be liberally construed. If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held to be invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 595, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74706.

It is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination that members of the commission are intended to represent and further the interest of the particular agricultural industry concerned and that this representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are elected or appointed to the commission, the particular agricultural industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 595, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74707.

A commission form of administration created by this chapter is designed to provide those engaged in the production and marketing of grape rootstock the opportunity to avail themselves of the benefits of collective action in the broad field of grape rootstock research necessary to achieve the purposes stated herein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 49.5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [74710. - 74726.]

74710.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 595, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74711.

“Bearing acreage” means a planting grape rootstock three years or older from which cuttings can be taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 595, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74712.

“Board member” means a nursery owner or representative of an owner elected pursuant to Section 74778.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 595, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74713.

“Books and records” means books, records, contracts, documents, memoranda, papers, correspondence, or other written data pertaining to matters relating to the activities subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 595, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74714.

“Commission” means the California Grape Rootstock Improvement Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 595, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74715.

“Ex officio member” means a nonvoting member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 595, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74716.

“Grafted” means the art of joining parts of plants together in such a manner as they will unite and continue their growth as one plant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 595, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74717.

“Grafted grape rootstock” means a rootstock that has been grafted with a fruiting grape variety.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 595, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74718.

“Grape rootstock” means the rootstock portion of grapevines grown in California as a single species or hybrid combination in the family Vitaceae.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 595, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74719.

“Grape rootstock nursery” or “nursery” means any person in this state which operates under a California state nursery license and grows grape rootstock for commercial use or distribution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 726, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

74720.

“Grape rootstock research” means any cultural and biological research relating to grape rootstock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 595, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74721.

“Invoicable unit” means any rootstock cutting, or rooted rootstock cutting, or grafted grape rootstock that is used or distributed by a nursery for commercial purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 726, Sec. 14.5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

74721.5.

“Distribute” means to sell or otherwise transfer any rootstock cutting, rooted rootstock cutting, or grafted grape rootstock for commercial purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 726, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

74722.
